Utah statutes.
4-13-2.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Adulterated fertilizer" means any commercial fertilizer that contains an
ingredient that renders it injurious to beneficial plant life when applied in
accordance with the directions on the label, or contains crop or weed seed, or
is inadequately labeled to protect plant life.
(2)  "Brand" means any term, design, or trade mark used in connection with one
or several grades of commercial fertilizer or soil amendment.
(3)  "Commercial fertilizer" means any substance that contains one or more
recognized plant nutrients that is used for its plant nutrient content and is
designed for use or claimed to have value in promoting plant growth, exclusive
of unmanipulated animal and vegetable manures, marl, lime, limestone, wood
ashes, gypsum, and other products exempted by rule of the department.
(4)  "Distributor" means any person who:
(a)  imports, consigns, manufactures, produces, compounds, mixes, or blends
commercial fertilizer;
(b)  imports, consigns, manufactures, produces, compounds, sizes, or blends a
soil amendment; or
(c)  offers for sale, sells, barters, or otherwise supplies commercial
fertilizer or a soil amendment in this state.
(5)  "Fertilizer material" means a commercial fertilizer that contains either:
(a)  quantities of no more than one of the primary plant nutrients (nitrogen,
phosphoric acid and potash);
(b)  approximately 85% plant nutrients in the form of a single chemical
compound; or
(c)  plant or animal residues or by-products, or a natural material deposit
that is processed so that its primary plant nutrients have not been materially
changed, except through purification and concentration.
(6)  "Grade" means the percentage of total nitrogen, available phosphorus or
phosphoric acid, and soluble potassium or soluble potash stated in whole
numbers in the same terms, order, and percentages as in the guaranteed
analysis; provided, that specialty fertilizers may be guaranteed in fractional
units of less than one percent of total nitrogen, available phosphorus or
phosphoric acid, and soluble potassium or soluble potash and that fertilizer
materials such as bone meal, manures, and similar raw materials may be
guaranteed in fractional units.
(7) (a)  "Guaranteed analysis" means the minimum percentage by weight of plant
nutrients claimed in the following order and form:
Total nitrogen (N)      ____ percent
Available phosphoric acid (P0)  ____ percent
Soluble potash (K0)     ____ percent
(b)  For unacidulated mineral phosphatic materials and basic slag, bone,
tankage, and other organic phosphate materials, it means the total phosphoric
acid or degree of fineness.
(c)  Potential basicity or acidity expressed in terms of calcium carbonate
equivalent in multiples of one hundred pounds per ton, when required by rule.
(d) (i)  Guarantees for plant nutrients other than nitrogen, phosphorus, and
potassium may be permitted or required by rule of the department.
(ii)  The guarantees for such other nutrients shall be expressed in the form
of the element.
(iii)  The sources of such other nutrients, such as oxides, salt, chelates,
may be required to be stated on the application for registration and may be
included as a parenthetical statement on the label.
(iv)  Other beneficial substances or compounds, determinable by laboratory
methods, also may be guaranteed by permission of the department.
(v)  Any plant nutrients or other substances or compounds guaranteed are
subject to inspection and analysis in accord with the methods and rules
prescribed by the department.
(8)  "Investigational allowance" means an allowance for variations inherent in
the taking, preparation, and analysis of an official sample of commercial
fertilizer or soil amendment.
(9)  "Label" means the display of all written, printed, or graphic matter upon
the immediate container or statement accompanying a commercial fertilizer or
soil amendment.
(10)  "Labeling" means all written, printed, or graphic matter upon or
accompanying any commercial fertilizer or soil amendment, or advertisements,
brochures, posters, television and radio announcements used in promoting the
sale of such commercial fertilizers or soil amendments.
(11)  "Mixed fertilizer" means a commercial fertilizer containing any
combination of fertilizer materials.
(12)  "Official sample" means any sample of commercial fertilizer or soil
amendment taken by the department and designated as "official."
(13)  "Percent" or "percentage" means the percentage by weight.
(14)  "Registrant" means any person who registers a commercial fertilizer or a
soil amendment under the provisions of this chapter.
(15) (a)  "Soil amendment" means any substance that is intended to improve the
physical characteristics of soil.
(b)  "Soil amendment" does not include any commercial fertilizer, agriculture
liming materials, unmanipulated animal manure, unmanipulated vegetable manure,
pesticides, or other material exempt by rule of the department.
(16)  "Specialty fertilizer" means any commercial fertilizer distributed
primarily for non-farm use, such as home gardens, lawns, shrubbery, flowers,
golf courses, municipal parks, cemeteries, greenhouses, and nurseries.
(17)  "Ton" means a net weight of two thousand pounds avoirdupois.
